lb_LU.aff
FLAG long
SFX I1 N 6
SFX I1 0 sse/N0 [^e]e is:feminine is:singular
SFX I1 0 ësch/n0 ee is:feminine is:singular
SFX I1 0 hesse/N0 c is:feminine is:singular
SFX I1 0 nin/n2 o is:feminine is:singular
SFX I1 0 ess/n0 [dn] is:feminine is:singular
SFX I1 0 a/n0 r is:feminine is:singular

SFX u1 N 2
SFX u1 n 0 . is:eifeler
SFX u1 0 ter . is:plural

SFX w1 N 16
SFX w1 n 0 n
SFX w1 annen ënnt annen
SFX w1 annen onnt annen
SFX w1 afen eeft afen
SFX w1 oen eet oen
SFX w1 oen oungen/f0 oen
SFX w1 oen oung oen
SFX w1 oen éingen/f0 oen
SFX w1 oen éing oen
SFX w1 oen inn/f0 oen
SFX w1 ommen ënnt ommen
SFX w1 en 0 men
SFX w1 mmen umen/f0 mmen
SFX w1 mmen um mmen
SFX w1 ommen éimen/f0 ommen
SFX w1 ommen éim ommen

SFX b1 N 9
SFX b1 en t/a0 [^djrtw]en
SFX b1 den t/a0 [^d]den
SFX b1 dden tt/a0 dden
SFX b1 en t/a0 [^äio]ren
SFX b1 ren ert/a0 [äio]ren
SFX b1 ën t/a0 ën
SFX b1 jen cht/a0 jen
SFX b1 wen ft/a0 wen
SFX b1 en 0/a0 ten

SFX e1 N 47
SFX e1 aach iech aach is:plural
SFX e1 ad ied ad is:plural
SFX e1 n 0 en is:eifeler
SFX e1 am eem am is:plural
SFX e1 um im um is:plural
SFX e1 us is us is:plural
SFX e1 ag eeg ag is:plural
SFX e1 en ng een is:plural
SFX e1 d n nd is:plural
SFX e1 af ief [ht]af is:plural
SFX e1 af eef [^ht]af is:plural
SFX e1 aasch eesch aasch is:plural
SFX e1 uedem iedem uedem is:plural
SFX e1 ugel igel ugel is:plural
SFX e1 uechter iechter uechter is:plural
SFX e1 od eed od is:plural
SFX e1 op eep op is:plural
SFX e1 uef ief uef is:plural
SFX e1 ut it ut is:plural
SFX e1 k g k is:plural
SFX e1 oopst eepst oopst is:plural
SFX e1 usch isch usch is:plural
SFX e1 of eef of is:plural
SFX e1 ol eel ol is:plural
SFX e1 on een on is:plural
SFX e1 ub ibb ub is:plural
SFX e1 uch ich uch is:plural
SFX e1 udder idder udder is:plural
SFX e1 ued ied ued is:plural
SFX e1 uerf ierf uerf is:plural
SFX e1 uerm ierm uerm is:plural
SFX e1 uerz ierz uerz is:plural
SFX e1 uewen iewen/f0 uewen is:plural
SFX e1 uff iff uff is:plural
SFX e1 ull ill ull is:plural
SFX e1 umm imm umm is:plural
SFX e1 unn inn unn is:plural
SFX e1 utsch itsch utsch is:plural
SFX e1 utt itt utt is:plural
SFX e1 uuss iiss uuss is:plural
SFX e1 uet iet uet is:plural
SFX e1 ummer immer ummer is:plural
SFX e1 our ier our is:plural
SFX e1 uer ier uer is:plural
SFX e1 upp ipp upp is:plural
SFX e1 mënsch leit mënsch is:plural
SFX e1 u i u is:plural

SFX T2 N 46
SFX T2 ub ibbchen/d0 ub is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uert iertchen/D0 uert is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ul ilchen/d0 ul is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ueb iebchen/d0 ueb is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ueder iederchen/r0 ueder is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ugel igelchen/r0 ugel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uet ietchen/d0 uet is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 upp ippchen/d0 upp is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 urscht irschtchen/d0 urscht is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 af iefchen/D0 af is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ued iedchen/d0 ued is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uerm iermchen/d0 uerm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ummer immerchen/r0 ummer is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 utt ittchen/d0 utt is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 on eenchen/d0 on is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uerz ierzchen/d0 uerz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uedem iedemchen/r0 uedem is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ues ieschen/d0 ues is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 unn innchen/d0 unn is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 utz itzelchen/r0 utz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ad iedchen/D0 [Ppt]ad is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uf ifchen/D0 uf is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 us ischen/d0 us is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 at ietchen/D0 at is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 am eemchen/d0 am is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ad iedchen/d0 [Rr]ad is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uerf ierfchen/d0 uerf is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 aass iesschen/D0 aass is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ull illchen/d0 ull is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 umm immchen/d0 umm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 um imchen/d0 um is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 as ieschen/d0 as is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uuss iisschen/d0 uuss is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 udder idderchen/r0 udder is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uch ichelchen/r0 uch is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 unkt inktelchen/r0 unkt is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uucht iichtchen/d0 uucht is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 d odchen/D0 od is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 dden itchen/D0 dden is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 p opchen/D0 op is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 m omchen/D0 om is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uddel iddelchen/r0 uddel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 utsch itschelchen/r0 utsch is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 ut iitchen/D0 ut is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 our ierchen/d0 our is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T2 uer ierchen/r0 uer is:diminutive is:singular

SFX L1 N 1
SFX L1 0 chen/f0 . is:diminutive is:singular

SFX D9 N 1
SFX D9 p omchen/D0 [Bb]op is:feminine is:diminutive is:singular
