lb_LU.dic
Adoptivbrudder/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Adoptivduechter/n0e1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Adressebuch/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Akafswon/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Aktiounsdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ampull/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Aprikosebam/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Aussiichtstuerm/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ausverkaf/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bam/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bandwuerm/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Baron/n0F6I1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bauer/n0F6e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Béierglas/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
bekommen/w1 po:verb
Beruffspompjee/E0I1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bëschofshutt/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bicherschaf/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Biergduerf/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Birebam/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bléieblat/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Bop/n0I0T2D9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Brautrénk/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Brudder/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Buedembelag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Chrëschtbam/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Club/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Comte/N0I1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Dafsteen/O0e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Dampzuch/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Dateinumm/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Daum/n0T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Dënschdegmueren/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Dëschtennisclub/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Donneschdegmueren/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Drauf/t0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Duc/n0I1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Duch/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Duechter/n0e1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Eechebam/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Elektrouewen/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Entzuch/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Exfrënd/F6e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fangerhutt/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
feelgoen/s0w1 po:verb
Fëmmraum/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fëscherduerf/e1T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Firmennumm/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fluch/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Flued/n0T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fräiraum/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Freidegmoien/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Freidegmueren/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Friddensdauf/t0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Fuersécherheetsdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fuerz/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gebeessglas/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Gebietsdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Geeschterzuch/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Glas/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Glasdaach/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Groussstad/e1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Hallefbrudder/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Handelsdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hauf/t0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Heemechtsduerf/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Heemelmaus/e1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Hierstellernumm/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hues/n0T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hunn/n0T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hybridwon/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Iwwerganksdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
iwwerlafen/s0w1 po:verb
Juegdhaus/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Jugendclub/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Jugendpompjee/E0I1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kalennerblat/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Kannerduerf/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Kannergebuertsdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Karblumm/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kaul/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Keeserstull/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kéistupp/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kellerluucht/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kiermesdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kiischtebam/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kleederschaf/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Knaus/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Knuet/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Konschtfrënd/F6O0e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kreditkrunn/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kristallglas/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Kueb/n0T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kuerf/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kulturhaaptstad/e1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kummer/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Lagerraum/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Liesdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Liiblingsdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Lofthummer/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mäertesdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Maître/N0I1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mandarinnebam/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Maschtepull/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mauer/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Meereen/f0L1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Méindegmueren/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mëllechglas/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Mëttwochmueren/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Militärwon/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mirabellebam/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mod/e1T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Moien/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Motorschued/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mueren/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Muergen/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mutz/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Neijoerschdagsmoien/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Nieresteen/O0e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Nuddel/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Ongléckszuch/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ouschterhues/n0T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Partnerstad/e1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Pharao/n0I1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Plaum/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Pompjee/E0I1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Poopst/I0e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Putsch/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Réckfluch/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Reen/f0L1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Samschdegmueren/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Sau/e1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Schaf/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Schlofkummer/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Schnéistuerm/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Señor/n0I1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Sonndegmueren/u1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Spendenopruff/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Spuerbuch/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Staatsnumm/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
stattfannen/s0w1
Steward/n0I1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Stroossebam/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Stroossebelag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Summerhutt/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Televisiounstuerm/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Trauerdag/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Tut/n0T2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Universitéitsstad/e1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Urbop/n0I0T2D9 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Vakanzenduerf/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
verschéineren/V0v0b1 po:verb
Versécherungsnol/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Waasserglas/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Waasserlaf/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Wäschkuerf/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Wënzerduerf/u0T2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Wuerekuerf/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Wupp/n0T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Zäit/n0L1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
zerlafen/v0w1 po:verb
Zockerhutt/e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Zwillingsbrudder/e1T2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
